Utah statutes.
20A-5-400.1.   Contracting with an election officer to conduct elections -- Fees -- Contracts and interlocal agreements -- Private providers.

(1) (a)  In accordance with this section, a local political subdivision may enter into a contract or interlocal agreement as provided in Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act, with a provider election officer to conduct an election.

(b)  If the boundaries of a local political subdivision holding the election extend beyond a single local political subdivision, the local political subdivision may have more than one provider election officer conduct an election.

(2)  A provider election officer shall conduct an election:

(a)  under the direction of the contracting election officer; and

(b)  in accordance with a contract or interlocal agreement.

(3)  A provider election officer shall establish fees for conducting an election for a contracting election officer that:

(a)  are consistent with the contract or interlocal agreement; and

(b)  do not exceed the actual costs incurred by the provider election officer.

(4)  The contract or interlocal agreement under this section may specify that a contracting election officer request, within a specified number of days before the election, that the provider election officer conduct the election to allow adequate preparations by the provider election officer.

(5)  An election officer conducting an election may appoint or employ an agent or professional service to assist in conducting the election.



Enacted by Chapter 310, 2011 General Session

